Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1003
Nebraska Safety Center at the University of Nebraska at Kearney; established.

(1) The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska may establish the Nebraska Safety Center at the University of Nebraska at Kearney.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that existing available land and facilities be utilized in the establishment and administration of the center.

Laws 1978, LB 693, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 247, § 29.